Missouri, session 2026, HB2399.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 213, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 213.145, to read as follows:
213.145. No person's rights, privileges, or access to public services shall be
denied or abridged solely because such person is experiencing homelessness. Such
person shall be granted the same rights and privileges as any other citizen of this state.
A person experiencing homelessness has the following rights:
(1) The right to move freely in public spaces, including sidewalks and public
buildings, parks, and transportation;
(2) The right to equal treatment by city and state agencies;
(3) The right to emergency medical care;
(4) The right to a reasonable expectation of privacy for personal property, just as
inside a home;
(5) The right to vote, register to vote, and receive documentation necessary to
prove identity; and
(6) The right to protection from disclosure of his or her records and information
without appropriate legal authority and the right to confidentiality of personal records.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.